Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.835

Employment of deterred action for childhood arrivals recipient—Liability for breach of contract limited.

Any agency that employs a deferred action for childhood arrivals recipient under RCW 41.08.070, 41.12.070, 41.14.100, or 77.15.075 may not be held liable for any breach of contract resulting from changes in federal law that would prohibit the agency from employing a deferred action for childhood arrivals recipient.

[ 2024 c 330 s 9.]